Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1458
Business, defined.

Business shall mean a corporation, government, governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity which is a landlord, owner, manager, or deemed to be an agent pursuant to section 76-1480.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 485.